Washington statutes.
RCW 16.70.010

Purpose.

The incidence of disease communicated to human beings by contact with pet animals has shown an increase in the past few years. The danger to human beings from such pets infected with disease communicable to humans has demonstrated the necessity for legislation to authorize the secretary of the department of health and the state board of health to take such action as is necessary to control the sale, importation, movement, transfer, or possession of such animals where it becomes necessary in order to protect the public health and welfare.

[ 1991 c 3 s 2; 1971 c 72 s 1.]